Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There are appropriated to the Department of Justice,  for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following  pur-
poses:
(1) Office of the Attorney
General and Administration ..... $ 935,079
(2) Appellate Division ..................... $ 516,749
(3) Criminal Justice Division.......... $ 38,821,710
(4) Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division....................... $ 44,981,081
(5) Defense of Criminal
Convictions................................ $ 50,704,853
(6) Division of Child Support.......... $ 62,106,015
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of  Justice,
for the following purposes:
(1) Office of the Attorney
General and Administration ..... $ 63,106,199
(2) Appellate Division ..................... $ 35,101,104
(3) Civil Enforcement Division ....... $ 79,814,934
(4) Child Advocacy Division............ $ 96,062,875
(5) Criminal Justice Division.......... $ 9,185,540
(6) Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division....................... $ 48,288,642
(7) General Counsel Division .......... $101,946,559
(8) Trial Division ............................ $ 79,080,639
(9) Division of Child Support.......... $ 26,241,654
(10) Debt Service and Related
Costs........................................ $ 7,380,272
Enrolled House Bill 5014 (HB 5014-A) Page 1
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses  from federal funds collected or received by the Department of Justice for the
following purposes:
(1) Civil Enforcement Division ....... $ 8,701,174
(2) Criminal Justice Division.......... $ 1,514,738
(3) Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division....................... $ 48,446,057
(4) Division of Child Support.......... $163,900,073
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5014 (HB 5014-A) Page 2